District of Columbia statutes.
2-305.01

Repealed

Bonds.

Repealed.

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 501, 32 DCR 7396
Apr. 15, 1997, D.C. Law 11-259, § 101(r), 44 DCR 1423
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 119(e), 47 DCR 520
Apr. 7, 2006, D.C. Law 16-91, § 130(d), 52 DCR 10637
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1201(a), 58 DCR 1185
1981 Ed., § 1-1185.1.